California, session 20252026, AB1755.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 11201 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:11201. For the purposes of this chapter, all of the following shall apply:(a) “Unemployed parent” means a natural or adoptive parent with whom the child is living.(b) A child for whom a parent is applying for assistance under this chapter shall be considered to be deprived of parental support or care due to the unemployment of the child’s parent or parents, regardless of the number of hours the child’s parent or parents work, provided that the family does not exceed the applicable gross or net income limits and is otherwise eligible for assistance.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.